District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-309.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 901, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(i), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

History

1981 Ed., § 30-349.1.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.”

Effect of Amendments

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Effective Dates

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 901 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

Editor's Notes